District of Columbia statutes.
44-1102.16

Repealed

Terms for sale of bonds; additional bond and note provisions.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 216, 43 DCR 4962
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.16.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary delay of the effective date of §§ 214-217 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997, see § 601(b) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-39, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2044).
Section 501(b) of D.C. Law 11-212 provided that §§ 214 through 217 of the act shall take effect upon the enactment by Congress of the legislation proposed in title III of the act or of substantially similar legislation.